North Dakota, session 69, HB1443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-04-10.7 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-04-10.7. Special number plates for farm vehicles and forestry vehicles.
The director shall issue, without an additional charge, upon application and payment of the
registration fee, special number plates or validation decals making them distinctly different from
other number plates, to any person registering a truck or combination of trucks and trailers as a
farm vehicle or forestry vehicle under section 39-04-19. The director shall determine the form
and size of the special number plates or validation decals and shall adopt rules governing the
issuance of these special number plates or validation decals.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 39-04-19 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. Trucks or combinations of trucks and trailers weighing more than twenty thousand but
not more than one hundred five thousand five hundred pounds [more than 9071.84 but
not more than 47854.00 kilograms] which are used as farm vehicles or forestry
vehicles only, are entitled to registration under the following fee schedule and the
provisions of this subsection. Farm vehicles are considered, for the purpose
a. For purposes of this subsection, as:
(1) "Farm vehicles" means trucks or combinations of trucks and trailers
weighing more than twenty thousand but not more than one hundred five
Page No. 1 25.0696.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
thousand five hundred pounds [more than 9071.84 but not more than
47854.00 kilograms] owned, or leased for at least one year by a bona fide
resident farmer who uses the vehicles exclusively for transporting the
farmer's own property or other property on a farm work exchange basis with
other farmers between farms and the usual local trading places but not in
connection with any commercial retail or wholesale business being
conducted from those farms, nor otherwise for hire.
(2) "Forestry vehicles" means motor vehicles meeting the requirements of
paragraph 1 and used in the business of forestry or a forestry-related
business.
b. In addition to the penalty provided in section 39-04-41, any person violating this
subsection shall license for the entire license period the farm vehicle at the higher
commercial vehicle rate in accordance with the weight carried by the farm vehicle
at the time of the violation.
YEARS REGISTERED
1st, 2nd, 7th and 9th and 11th and
Gross 3rd, 4th, 5th, 8th 10th Subsequent
Weights and 6th Years Years Years Years
20,001 - 22,000 $111 $97 $83 $65
22,001 - 24,000 116 101 86 67
24,001 - 26,000 124 107 90 69
26,001 - 28,000 135 115 96 73
28,001 - 30,000 144 123 102 77
30,001 - 32,000 159 136 113 86
32,001 - 34,000 169 144 119 90
34,001 - 36,000 179 152 125 94
36,001 - 38,000 189 160 131 98
38,001 - 40,000 199 168 137 102
40,001 - 42,000 209 176 143 106
42,001 - 44,000 219 184 149 110
44,001 - 46,000 229 192 155 114
Page No. 2 25.0696.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
46,001 - 48,000 239 200 161 118
48,001 - 50,000 249 208 167 122
50,001 - 52,000 269 226 183 136
52,001 - 54,000 279 234 189 140
54,001 - 56,000 289 242 195 144
56,001 - 58,000 299 250 201 148
58,001 - 60,000 309 258 207 152
60,001 - 62,000 319 266 213 156
62,001 - 64,000 329 274 219 160
64,001 - 66,000 339 282 225 164
66,001 - 68,000 349 290 231 168
68,001 - 70,000 359 298 237 172
70,001 - 72,000 369 306 243 176
72,001 - 74,000 379 314 249 180
74,001 - 76,000 389 322 255 184
76,001 - 78,000 399 330 261 188
78,001 - 80,000 409 338 267 192
80,001 - 82,000 419 346 273 196
82,001 - 84,000 429 368 316 272
84,001 - 86,000 449 385 330 284
86,001 - 88,000 469 402 344 296
88,001 - 90,000 489 419 358 308
90,001 - 92,000 509 436 372 320
92,001 - 94,000 529 453 386 332
94,001 - 96,000 549 470 400 344
96,001 - 98,000 569 487 414 356
98,001 - 100,000 589 504 428 368
100,001 - 102,000 609 521 442 380
102,001 - 104,000 629 538 456 392
104,001 - 105,500 649 555 470 404
Page No. 3 25.0696.02000